District of Columbia statutes.
38-1980

Repealed

Sabbatical leave provisions applicable to certain employees.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 529, ch. 569, title V, § 17
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1146.
1973 Ed., § 31-1546.